Utah statutes.
34-34-11.   Injunctive relief -- Damages.
Any employer, person, firm, association, corporation, employee, labor union,
labor organization or any other type of association injured as a result of any
violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter, or
threatened with any such violation shall be entitled to injunctive relief
against any and all violators or persons threatening violation and also to
recover from such violator or violators, or person or persons, any and all
damages of any character cognizable at common law resulting from such
violations or threatened violations. Such remedies shall be independent of and
in addition to the penalties and remedies prescribed in other provisions of
this chapter.
